Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-79] Record of trial. (a) Each
court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings of the trial of
each case brought before it and the record shall be authenticated by the
signatures of the president and the law officer. If the record cannot be
authenticated by either the president or the law officer, by reason of the
president's or law officer's death, disability, or absence, it shall be signed
by a member in lieu of the president or law officer. If both the president and
the law officer are unavailable, the record shall be authenticated by two
members. A record of the proceedings of a trial in which the sentence adjudged
includes a bad-conduct discharge or is more than that which could be adjudged
by a special court-martial shall contain a verbatim account of the proceedings
and testimony before the court. All other records of trial shall contain such
matter and be authenticated in such manner as the governor may by rule
prescribe.

(b) A copy of the record of the proceedings of
each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as
it is authenticated. If a verbatim record of trial by general court-martial is
not required by subsection (a), but has been made, the accused may buy such a
record under such rules as the governor may adopt. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next